Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 7. Extended Unemployment Compensation.

Sec. 23.20.406.
Extended benefits.

Except when the result would be inconsistent with other provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this chapter which apply to claims for or the payment of regular benefits apply to claims for and the payment of extended benefits.

An individual is eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period if the department finds that with respect to that week the individual

is an “exhaustee” as defined in AS

23.20.409

; and

has otherwise satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the receipt of regular benefits.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, an individual is ineligible for payment of extended benefits for any week of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period if the department finds that during that period the individual failed to

accept an offer of suitable work as defined under (k) of this section or failed to apply for suitable work to which the individual was referred by the department; or

actively seek work as prescribed under (f) of this section, except that the eligibility of the individual will be determined under AS

23.20.378

without regard to the disqualification provisions otherwise applicable under (d) of this section if the individual is not actively engaged in seeking work because the individual is

summoned for jury duty before a court of the United States or any state;

hospitalized for treatment of an emergency or life-threatening condition; or

attending an approved vocational training course under AS

23.20.382

.

An individual who has been found ineligible for extended benefits under (c) of this section shall be denied benefits beginning with the first day of the week following the week in which the failure occurred and until the individual has been employed in each of four subsequent weeks and has earned remuneration equal to not less than four times the extended weekly benefit amount, excluding the allowance for dependents.

An individual may not be denied extended benefits for failure to accept an offer of or referral to a job that is suitable work as defined in (l) of this section if

the job was not offered to that individual in writing and was not listed with the employment service;

the failure would not result in a denial of benefits under the definition of suitable work for regular benefit claimants in AS

23.20.385

to the extent that the criteria of suitability in that section are consistent with (l) of this section; or

the individual furnishes satisfactory evidence to the department that the prospects for obtaining work in the customary occupation of the individual within a reasonably short period are good; if the evidence is satisfactory for this purpose, the department shall determine whether any work is suitable for that individual in accordance with the definition of suitable work in AS

23.20.385

.

For the purposes of (c)(2) of this section, an individual is considered to be actively seeking work during a week if the individual furnishes evidence in writing to the department that the individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained effort to obtain work during that week.

The employment service shall refer an individual who is entitled to extended benefits under this chapter to any suitable work that meets the criteria prescribed in (l) of this section.

An individual is not eligible to receive extended benefits for any week of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period if the individual has been disqualified for benefits because the individual voluntarily left work, was discharged for misconduct, or refused an offer of suitable work, unless the disqualification imposed for those reasons has been terminated in accordance with AS

23.20.379(d)

.

Except as provided in (j) of this section, an individual is not eligible for extended benefits for a week of unemployment if

the individual files a claim for extended benefits which are payable under this chapter for that week;

the claim is an interstate claim filed in any state in accordance with the interstate benefit payment arrangement under AS

23.20.085

; and

an extended benefit period is not in effect for the week in the state in which the interstate claim is filed.

Subsection (i) of this section does not apply to the first two weeks for which extended benefits are payable to an individual, determined without regard to (i) of this section, under an interstate claim filed in accordance with AS

23.20.085

.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, an individual is not eligible for extended benefits unless, in the base period determined with respect to the individual’s applicable benefit year, the individual has been paid, for employment covered by this chapter, total wages that equal or exceed

40 times the weekly benefit amount, including any allowance for dependents, which is payable to the individual during the individual’s applicable benefit year; or

1.5 times the individual’s wages during the calendar quarter of the base period in which the individual’s wages were the highest.

In this section, “suitable work” means any work that is within the individual’s capabilities, if

the gross average weekly remuneration for the work

exceeds the sum of

the individual’s average weekly benefit amount as determined under AS

23.20.407

, plus

the amount, if any, of supplemental unemployment benefits as defined in 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(17)(D) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954) that are payable to the individual for that week; and

equals or exceeds the greater of

the minimum wages provided by 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1) (§ 6(a)(1), Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938), without regard to any exemption; or

the state minimum wage; and

the work is in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 3304(a)(5) (Internal Revenue Code of 1954), and AS

23.20.385(a)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1971; am §§ 5, 6 ch 114 SLA 1981; am § 19 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (i) and (j) were enacted as AS

23.20.408(i)

and (j) and renumbered in 1981.
Subsection (

l

) was enacted as (i) and relettered as (k) in 1981 and relettered again as (

l

) in 1996. Subsection (k) was formerly (

l

); relettered in 1996.

Sec. 23.20.407.
Weekly extended benefit amount; total payable.

The weekly extended benefit amount payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period is an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount, including the allowance for dependents, payable to the individual during the applicable benefit year.

The total extended benefit amount payable to any eligible individual with respect to the individual’s applicable benefit year is the least of the following amounts:

50 percent of the total amount of regular benefits, including dependents’ allowances, which were payable to the individual under this chapter in the individual’s applicable benefit year;

13 times the weekly benefit amount, including dependents’ allowances, which was payable to the individual under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year; or

39 times the weekly benefit amount, including dependents’ allowances, which was payable to the individual under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits which were paid or considered paid to the individual under this chapter with respect to the benefit year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the benefit year of an individual ends within an extended benefit period, the remaining balance of extended benefits that the individual would, but for this section, be entitled to receive in the extended benefit period, with respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall be reduced by the number of weeks for which the individual received an amount as a trade readjustment allowance within the benefit year multiplied by the individual’s weekly benefit amount for extended benefits. However, the extended benefits may not be reduced below zero.

During a high unemployment period, as described in AS

23.20.408(i)

, the total extended benefit amount payable to an eligible individual with respect to the individual’s applicable benefit year equals the lowest amount calculated under the following:

80 percent of the total amount of regular benefits, including dependents’ allowances, that were payable to the individual under this chapter in the individual’s applicable benefit year;

20 times the weekly benefit amount, including dependents’ allowances, that was payable to the individual under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year; or

46 times the weekly benefit amount, including dependents’ allowances, that was payable to the individual under this chapter for a week of total unemployment in the applicable benefit year, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits that were paid or considered by the department to be paid to the individual under this chapter with respect to the benefit year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1971; am § 63 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 115 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 1993)

Sec. 23.20.408.
Extended benefit periods.

When an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a result of a state “on” indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be terminated in this state as a result of a state “off” indicator, the department shall make an appropriate public announcement.

An extended benefit period may not begin by reason of a state “on” indicator before the 14th week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.

[Repealed, § 25 ch 122 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 33 ch 115 SLA 1982.]

[Repealed, § 33 ch 115 SLA 1982.]

Except as provided in (g)(2) of this section, there is a state “on” indicator for a week if the

rate of insured unemployment under this chapter for the period consisting of that week and the immediately preceding 12 weeks either equaled or exceeded

120 percent of the average rate of insured unemployment for the corresponding 13-week period in each of the preceding two calendar years and equaled or exceeded five percent; or

six percent, without regard to the rate of insured unemployment in the two previous years; or

average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment, as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor, for the period consisting of the most recent three months for which data for all states are published before the end of that week equals or exceeds

6.5 percent; and

110 percent of that average for either or both of the corresponding three-month periods ending in the two preceding calendar years.

There is a state “off” indicator for a week if,

for the period consisting of that week and the immediately preceding 12 weeks, there was not an “on” indicator under (f) of this section; or

notwithstanding (f) of this section, in that week the state is otherwise eligible to participate in the emergency unemployment compensation program in 26 U.S.C. 3304; however, the department must trigger “off” to enable the state to participate in that program.

In (f) of this section, “rate of insured unemployment” means the percentage derived by dividing (1) the average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular compensation in this state for weeks of unemployment with respect to the most recent 13 consecutive week period, as determined by the department on the basis of its reports to the United States Secretary of Labor, by (2) the average monthly employment covered under this chapter for the first four of the most recent six completed calendar quarters ending before the close of that 13-week period. Computations required by this subsection shall be made by the department in accordance with regulations prescribed by the United States Secretary of Labor.

The state is in a high unemployment period if the circumstances set out in (f)(2) of this section are present, but the average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment equals or exceeds eight percent.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1971; am §§ 1, 2 ch 5 SLA 1975; am §§ 8 — 11, 25 ch 122 SLA 1977; am § 64 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 21 — 24, 33 ch 115 SLA 1982; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 28 SLA 1993; am § 37 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, “; however” was substituted for “, but” in (g)(2) of this section to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (h), substituted “In (f) of this section” for “In (f) and (g) of this section”.

Sec. 23.20.409.
Definitions for AS 23.20.406 — 23.20.409.

In AS

23.20.406

—

23.20.409

,

“applicable benefit year” means, with respect to an individual, the current benefit year if, at the time an initial claim for extended benefits is filed, the individual has an unexpired benefit year only in the state against which the claim is filed, or, in any other case, the individual’s most recent benefit year; the most recent benefit year, for an individual who has unexpired benefit years in more than one state when the initial claim for extended benefits is filed, is the benefit year with the latest ending date or, if the benefit years have the same ending date, the benefit year in which the latest continued claim for regular compensation was filed; extended benefits are not payable under this section unless the “applicable benefit year” was a benefit year established under this chapter;

“eligibility period” of an individual means the period consisting of the weeks in the individual’s benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if the individual’s benefit year ends within the extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in that period;

“exhaustee” means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period, has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act or under other federal laws which are specified in regulations issued by the United States Secretary of Labor and has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of Canada, but if the individual is seeking these benefits and the appropriate agency finally determines that the individual is not entitled to benefits under that law the individual is considered an exhaustee; and either

has received, before that week of unemployment, all of the regular benefits that were available to the individual under this chapter or any other law, including dependents’ allowances and benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. 8501-8525, in the individual’s current benefit year that includes that week; however, for the purposes of this paragraph, an individual is considered to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to the individual even though the individual may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits as a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages in covered employment that were not considered in the original monetary determination to be in the individual’s benefit year; or

the individual’s benefit year having expired before that week, has no or insufficient wages in covered employment on the basis of which the individual could establish a new benefit year that would include that week;

“extended benefit period” means a period which

begins with the third week after a week for which there is a state “on” indicator; and

ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs later:

the third week after the first week for which there is a state “off” indicator; or

the 13th consecutive week of that period;

“extended benefits” means benefits, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. 8501-8525, payable to an individual under the provisions of AS

23.20.406

—

23.20.409

for weeks of unemployment in the individual’s eligibility period;

“regular benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other law, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. 8501-8525, other than extended benefits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1971; am § 24 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 12 ch 122 SLA 1977; am §§ 25, 26 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

For effective date of 1977 amendments, see the Revisor’s notes at AS

23.20.085

. This section was reorganized in 1984 to place the defined terms in alphabetical order.